Texas statutes.
SPECIAL DISTRICT LOCAL LAWS CODE

TITLE 6. WATER AND WASTEWATER

SUBTITLE H. DISTRICTS GOVERNING GROUNDWATER

CHAPTER 8879. CROCKETT COUNTY GROUNDWATER CONSERVATION DISTRICT

SUBCHAPTER A. GENERAL PROVISIONS

Sec. 8879.001. DEFINITIONS. In this chapter:

(1) "Board" means the district's board of directors.

(2) "Director" means a board member.

(3) "District" means the Crockett County Groundwater Conservation District.

Added by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 869 (H.B. 2803), Sec. 1.04, eff. April 1, 2019.

Sec. 8879.002. NATURE OF DISTRICT. The district is a groundwater conservation district in Crockett County created under and essential to accomplish the purposes of Section 59, Article XVI, Texas Constitution.

Added by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 869 (H.B. 2803), Sec. 1.04, eff. April 1, 2019.

Sec. 8879.003. FINDINGS OF PUBLIC USE AND BENEFIT. (a) The district is created to serve a public use and benefit.

(b) All land and other property included in the district will benefit from the works and projects accomplished by the district under the powers conferred by Section 59, Article XVI, Texas Constitution.

Added by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 869 (H.B. 2803), Sec. 1.04, eff. April 1, 2019.

Sec. 8879.004. DISTRICT TERRITORY. (a) The district is composed of the territory in Crockett County other than the tract of land described by metes and bounds in Section 3, Chapter 712, Acts of the 71st Legislature, Regular Session, 1989, as that territory may have been modified under:

(1) Subchapter J or K, Chapter 36, Water Code; or

(2) other law.

(b) The boundaries and field notes of the district form a closure. A mistake in the field notes or in copying the field notes in the legislative process does not affect:

(1) the district's organization, existence, or validity;

(2) the district's right to impose taxes; or

(3) the legality or operation of the district or its governing body.

Added by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 869 (H.B. 2803), Sec. 1.04, eff. April 1, 2019.

Sec. 8879.005. LOCATION OF DISTRICT ELECTIONS. A district election may be held at any location in Crockett County.

Added by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 869 (H.B. 2803), Sec. 1.04, eff. April 1, 2019.

Sec. 8879.006. CONFLICTS OF LAW. This chapter prevails over any provision of general law that is in conflict or inconsistent with this chapter.

Added by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 869 (H.B. 2803), Sec. 1.04, eff. April 1, 2019.

SUBCHAPTER B. BOARD OF DIRECTORS

Sec. 8879.051. COMPOSITION OF BOARD; TERMS. (a) The district is governed by a board of five elected directors.

(b) Directors serve staggered four-year terms, with the terms of two or three directors expiring December 1 of each even-numbered year.

Added by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 869 (H.B. 2803), Sec. 1.04, eff. April 1, 2019.

Sec. 8879.052. ELECTION DATE. The district shall hold an election to elect the appropriate number of directors on the uniform election date in November of each even-numbered year.

Added by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 869 (H.B. 2803), Sec. 1.04, eff. April 1, 2019.

Sec. 8879.053. DISQUALIFICATION OF DIRECTORS. Notwithstanding Sections 49.001 and 49.002(b), Water Code, Section 49.052, Water Code, applies to a director.

Added by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 869 (H.B. 2803), Sec. 1.04, eff. April 1, 2019.

SUBCHAPTER C. POWERS AND DUTIES

Sec. 8879.101. GENERAL POWERS AND DUTIES. The district has the rights, powers, privileges, functions, and duties provided by the general law of this state, including Chapter 36 and Subchapters H and I, Chapter 49, Water Code, applicable to groundwater conservation districts created under Section 59, Article XVI, Texas Constitution.

Added by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 869 (H.B. 2803), Sec. 1.04, eff. April 1, 2019.

SUBCHAPTER D. GENERAL FINANCIAL PROVISIONS

Sec. 8879.151. LIMITATION ON AD VALOREM TAX RATE. Except as provided by Section 8879.152, the rate of an ad valorem tax imposed by the district under Chapter 36, Water Code, may not exceed five cents on each $100 of assessed valuation.

Added by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 869 (H.B. 2803), Sec. 1.04, eff. April 1, 2019.

Sec. 8879.152. ELECTION TO INCREASE AD VALOREM TAX RATE. (a) If at a regular meeting of the board, the board determines that the district ad valorem tax is no longer sufficient, the board may hold an election to approve an increase in the district's tax rate not to exceed an additional five cents on each $100 of assessed valuation above the rate specified by Section 8879.151.

(b) If a majority of the voters favor the increase in the district's tax rate, the district may impose an ad valorem tax at the increased rate.

Added by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 869 (H.B. 2803), Sec. 1.04, eff. April 1, 2019.